District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.21

Repealed

Deposit of security — Suspension for failure.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 126, ch. 222, § 21
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1981 Ed., § 40-421.
1973 Ed., § 40-437.